Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 8. HEALTH INSURANCE AND OTHER HEALTH COVERAGES

SUBTITLE M. FEDERAL PATIENT PROTECTION AND AFFORDABLE CARE ACT

CHAPTER 1695. LEGISLATIVE CONSIDERATIONS

Sec. 1695.001. CONSTITUTIONALITY OF PATIENT PROTECTION AND AFFORDABLE CARE ACT. This subtitle does not constitute an acknowledgment by the legislature of the legitimacy of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Pub. L. No. 111-148) as a constitutional exercise of the power of the United States Congress.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 214), Sec. 1, eff. December 1, 2017.